North Carolina, session 2025, HB1140.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, Article 2 of Chapter 126 of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 126-8.8. Paid bereavement leave.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Colleague. – A coworker with whom the employee worked at the employee's
current agency, if the coworker worked for the agency within one year of their
death.
(2) Immediate family member. – A spouse, parent, child, sibling, grandparent,
grandchild, or dependent living in the employee's household. The term
includes the step, half, adoptive, foster, in-law, legal ward, and in loco parentis
relationships.
(b) The State Human Resources Commission (Commission) shall adopt rules and policies
to provide that a permanent, probationary, or time-limited full-time State employee is granted up
to 40 hours of paid leave following the loss of an immediate family member and up to eight hours
of paid leave to eligible employees for bereavement following the loss of a colleague.
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules and policies to provide that a permanent,
probationary, or time-limited part-time State employee shall be granted a prorated amount of
paid bereavement leave on an equitable basis.
(d) The rules and policies adopted by the Commission shall include the following
requirements, at a minimum:
(1) That an employee requesting paid bereavement leave submit a statement
stating the name and relationship of the deceased.
(2) Employees are eligible for paid bereavement leave immediately upon being
hired for any loss that occurs on or after the first day of work with the agency.
(3) No annual limit on the number of uses of paid bereavement leave, if the leave
follows the loss of an immediate family member or colleague.
(4) The amount of time required to travel to and from and to attend a funeral or
other memorial event of a colleague is allowed, but not to exceed eight hours.
The leave may only be used on the date of the funeral or other memorial event.
*H1140-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Employees shall provide documentation of attendance at the memorial event
following use of the leave.
(5) If an employee transfers from one agency to another agency, and the employee
has any amount of unused paid bereavement leave for which they are eligible,
the employee may use the remainder of the paid bereavement leave for which
they are eligible at that agency.
(6) Employees must provide documentation of death of an immediate family
member at the time the paid bereavement leave is requested or, if the
documentation is not available at the time of the request, as soon as the
documentation is available. Acceptable documentation may include a death
certificate, obituary, and funeral or memorial event information.
(7) Paid bereavement leave for an immediate family member must be used within
180 days of the date of death (or discovery of death if circumstances caused
the discovery of the death to be significantly later than the date of death). The
leave may be used as the employee needs and does not have to be used on
consecutive days, subject to approval.
(8) Any employee who attempts to gain eligibility for paid bereavement leave
through falsification of a familial relationship, falsification of a death,
falsification of supporting documentation, or any other untruthful manner
shall be subject to disciplinary action, up to and including dismissal.
(e) The paid bereavement leave authorized by this section:
(1) Is available without exhaustion of the employee's sick and vacation leave and
is awarded in addition to shared leave under G.S. 126-8.3, or other leave
authorized by State or federal law.
(2) Has no cash value upon termination from employment.
(3) May not be used for calculating an employee's retirement benefits.
(4) Shall not be applied to negative leave balances.
(5) Shall not be donated as shared leave under G.S. 126-8.3.
(f) The provisions of this section shall apply to employees of State agencies,
departments, and institutions, including The University of North Carolina; to public school
employees; and to community college employees. The appropriate governing board, officer, or
entity shall adopt rules and policies to award paid bereavement leave to employees that are
substantially equivalent to those adopted by the State Human Resources Commission."
SECTION 1.(b) Effective July 1, 2026, G.S. 126-5(c19) reads as rewritten:
"(c19) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, G.S. 126-8.6 applies
G.S. 126-8.6 and G.S. 126-8.8 apply to all State employees, public school employees, and
community college employees. G.S. 126-8.6 does and G.S. 126-8.8 do not apply to employees
described in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (c1) of G.S. 126-5. The legislative and judicial
branches shall adopt parental leave and bereavement leave policies."
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Reserve for Compensation Increases the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to fund paid bereavement leave as authorized by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to requests for
paid bereavement leave for deaths occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 1140-First Edition